Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 441 Jails and County Prisoners

441.005.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Jail” means county jails and correctional or detention facilities, including correctional facilities defined in KRS

67B.020

and juvenile detention facilities, operated by and under the supervision of any political subdivision;

“Holdover” means any jail housing prisoners for a maximum period of ninety-six (96) continuous hours and excluding times when a prisoner is released for a minimum of seven (7) hours for the purpose of working at his or her employment, attending an educational institution, or conducting other business pursuant to a court order, or when a prisoner is released for in court proceedings;

“Prisoner” means any person confined in jail pursuant to any code, ordinance, law, or statute of any unit of government and who is:

Charged with or convicted of an offense; or

Held for extradition or as a material witness; or

Confined for any other reason;

“Unit of government” means that unit of government including the United States government whose law, statute, ordinance, or code a prisoner is charged with violating. If a person is imprisoned for contempt of court, the state shall be deemed the responsible unit of government;

“Department” means the Department of Corrections;

“Jail personnel” means deputy jailers, matrons, cooks, and other food service personnel, and other jail employees involved in the supervision, custody, care, or treatment of prisoners in jails but does not include maintenance or clerical personnel;

“Regional jail” means a jail which is:

Owned and operated by one (1) county and, on a regular basis, holds prisoners for another county or for the state; or

Owned and operated by two (2) or more counties through a regional jail authority as provided in KRS

441.800

;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Corrections; and

“Reentry center” means a supervised community residential facility operated by a local correctional facility, county jail, or regional jail as detailed in KRS

441.146

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 1, effective January 1, 1978; 1982, ch. 385, § 1, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 428, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 141, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 415, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 211, § 113, effective July 14, 1992; 2017 ch. 158, § 87, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 109, § 6, effective April 24, 2020.

441.006.
County responsibility for incarceration of prisoners — How met. [Renumbered.]

441.007.
State contribution for jail — Payments — Use of funds — Adjustment of state contribution. [Renumbered.]

441.008.
Jail operating budget — Financial records. [Renumbered.]

441.009.
Jailer’s salary — Calculation — Adjustment. [Renumbered.]

441.010.
Rules for county jails — Inspection — Medical care for prisoners. [Renumbered.]

441.011.
Regulation of jails — Adoption and revision of standards. [Renumbered.]

441.012.
Responsibilities of cabinet — Jail inspections — Access to jails — Reports. [Renumbered.]

441.013.
Violation of regulations — Orders and sanctions — Procedures for orders. [Renumbered.]

441.014.
Violation of regulations prohibited — Cabinet may seek court order — Civil contempt penalty. [Renumbered.]

441.015.
Appeals. [Renumbered.]

441.016.
Reports to fiscal court and cabinet by jailer. [Renumbered.]

441.017.
Local corrections training program — Jailer’s training expense allowance — Eligibility requirements. [Renumbered.]

441.020.
United States and cities may use county jails. [Renumbered.]